Utah statutes.
67-19a-408.   Career Service Review Board hearing -- Evidentiary and
procedural rules.
(1)  The board shall:
(a)  hold a hearing to review the hearing officer's decision not later than 30
days after it receives the official transcript and the briefs;
(b)  review the decision of the hearing officer by considering the official
record of that hearing and the briefs of the parties; and
(c)  issue its written decision addressing the hearing officer's decision
within 40 working days after the record for its proceeding is closed.
(2)  If the board does not issue its written decision within 40 working days
after closing the record, the agency that is a party to the grievance is not
liable for any claimed back wages or benefits after the date the decision is
due.
(3)  The board may not award attorneys' fees or costs to either party.
(4)  The board may close a hearing by complying with the procedures and
requirements of Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.
(5)  The board may seal the file and the evidence produced at the hearing if
the evidence raises questions about an employee's character, professional
competence, or physical or mental health.
